test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tuj_gt-norm.yaml
Tests:
  
  Noun - туй: # Ordinary nouns - full paradigm 'road / tie / дорога'
     туй+N+Sg+Nom: туй
     туй+N+Sg+Acc: [туй, туйӧс]
     туй+N+Sg+Gen: туйлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl: туйлысь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat: туйлы
     туй+N+Sg+Instr: туйӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Com: туйкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car: туйтӧг
     туй+N+Sg+Cns: туйла
     туй+N+Sg+Comp: туйся
     туй+N+Sg+Ine: туйын
     туй+N+Sg+Ela: туйысь
     туй+N+Sg+Ill: туйӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Apr: туйлань
     туй+N+Sg+Egr: туйсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Prl: туйӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Tra: туйті
     туй+N+Sg+Ter: туйӧдз
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine: туйланьын
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela: туйланьысь
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill: туйланьӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Egr: туйланьсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl: туйланьӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra: туйланьті
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter: туйланьӧдз
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: туйӧй
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: туйӧйлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl: туйӧйлысь
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: туйӧйлы
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: туйӧс
     туй+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg1: туйнам
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Com: туйӧйкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Car: туйӧйтӧг
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Cns: туйӧйла
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Comp: туйӧйся
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: туям
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: туйсьым
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: туям
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Apr: туйӧйлань
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Egr: туйӧйсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: туйӧдым
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg1: туйтіым
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg1: туйӧдзым
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg1: туйланям
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxSg1: туйланьсьым
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg1: туйланям
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Apr+Egr: туйӧйланьсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxSg1: туйланьӧдым
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxSg1: туйланьтіым
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxSg1: туйланьӧдзым
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: туйыд
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen: туйыдлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl: туйыдлысь
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat: туйыдлы
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc: туйтӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg2: туйнад
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com: туйыдкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxSg2: туйтӧгыд
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cns: туйыдла
     туй+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg2: туйсяыд
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: туяд
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: туйсьыд
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: туяд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: туйланьыд
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: туйсяньыд
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: туйӧдыд
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg2: туйтіыд
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: туйӧдзыд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg2: туйланяд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxSg2: туйланьсьыд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg2: туйланяд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Egr+PxSg2: туйланьсяньыд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxSg2: туйланьӧдыд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxSg2: туйланьтіыд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxSg2: туйланьӧдзыд
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: туйыс
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen: туйыслӧн
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl: туйыслысь
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat: туйыслы
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc: туйсӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg3: туйнас
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com: туйыскӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxSg3: туйтӧгыс
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cns: туйысла
     туй+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg3: туйсяыс
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: туяс
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: туйсьыс
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: туяс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: туйланьыс
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: туйсяньыс
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: туйӧдыс
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3: туйтіыс
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: туйӧдзыс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg3: туйланяс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxSg3: туйланьсьыс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg3: туйланяс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Egr+PxSg3: туйланьсяньыс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxSg3: туйланьӧдыс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxSg3: туйланьтіыс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxSg3: туйланьӧдзыc
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: туйным
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Gen: туйнымлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl: туйнымлысь
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Dat: туйнымлы
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Acc: туйнымӧс
     туй+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl1: туйнаным
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Com: туйнымкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxPl1: туйтӧгным
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Cns: туйнымла
     туй+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl1: туйсяным
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: туяным
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: туйсьыным
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: туяным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: туйланьным
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: туйсяньным
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: туйӧдным
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl1: туйтіным
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl1: туйӧдзным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl1: туйланяным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxPl1: туйланьсьыным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl1: туйланяным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Egr+PxPl1: туйланьсяньным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxPl1: туйланьӧдным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxPl1: туйланьтіным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxPl1: туйланьӧдзным
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: туйныд
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Gen: туйныдлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl: туйныдлысь
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Dat: туйныдлы
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Acc: туйнытӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl2: туйнаныд
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Com: туйныдкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxPl2: туйтӧгныд
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Cns: туйныдла
     туй+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl2: туйсяныд
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: туяныд
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: туйсьыныд
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: туяныд
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Apr: туйныдлань
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: туйсяньныд
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: туйӧдныд
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl2: туйтіныд
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl2: туйӧдзныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl2: туйланяныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxPl2: туйланьсьыныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl2: туйланяныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Egr+PxPl2: туйланьсяньныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxPl2: туйланьӧдныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxPl2: туйланьтіныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxPl2: туйланьӧдзныд
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: туйныс
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Gen: туйныслӧн
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl: туйныслысь
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Dat: туйныслы
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Acc: туйнысӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl3: туйнаныс
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Com: туйныскӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxPl3: туйтӧгныс
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Cns: туйнысла
     туй+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl3: туйсяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: туяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: туйсьыныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: туяныс
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Apr: туйныслань
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: туйланьныс
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: туйсяньныс
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: туйӧдныс
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl3: туйтіныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl3: туйӧдзныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl3: туйланяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxPl3: туйланьсьыныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl3: туйланяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Egr+PxPl3: туйланьсяньныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxPl3: туйланьӧдныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxPl3: туйланьтіныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxPl3: туйланьӧдзныс
     туй+N+Pl+Nom: туйяс
     туй+N+Pl+Acc: [туйяс, туйясӧс]
     туй+N+Pl+Gen: туйяслӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl: туйяслысь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat: туйяслы
     туй+N+Pl+Instr: туйясӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Com: туйяскӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car: туйястӧг
     туй+N+Pl+Cns: туйясла
     туй+N+Pl+Comp: туйясся
     туй+N+Pl+Ine: туйясын
     туй+N+Pl+Ela: туйясысь
     туй+N+Pl+Ill: туйясӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Apr: туйяслань
     туй+N+Pl+Egr: туйяссянь
     туй+N+Pl+Prl: туйясӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Tra: туйясті
     туй+N+Pl+Ter: туйясӧдз
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine: туйясланьын
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela: туйясланьысь
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill: туйясланьӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Egr: туйясланьсянь
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl: туйясланьӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra: туйясланьті
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter: туйясланьӧдз
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: туйясӧй
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen: туйясӧйлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl: туйясӧйлысь
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: туйясӧйлы
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc: туйясӧс
     туй+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg1: туйяснам
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: туйясӧйкӧд
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Car: туйясӧйтӧг
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Cns: туйясӧйла
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Comp: туйясӧйся
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: туйясам
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: туйяссьым
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: туйясам
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Apr: туйясӧйлань
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Egr: туйясӧйсянь
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: туйясӧдым
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg1: туйястіым
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: туйясӧдзым
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxSg1: туйясланям
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxSg1: туйясланьсьым
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxSg1: туйясланям
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Apr+Egr: туйясӧйланьсянь
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxSg1: туйясланьӧдым
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxSg1: туйясланьтіым
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxSg1: туйясланьӧдзым
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: туйясыд
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen: туйясыдлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl: туйясыдлысь
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat: туйясыдлы
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc: туйястӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg2: туйяснад
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com: туйясыдкӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxSg2: туйястӧгыд
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cns: туйясыдла
     туй+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg2: туйяссяыд
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: туйясад
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: туйяссьыд
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: туйясад
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: туйясланьыд
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: туйяссяньыд
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: туйясӧдыд
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg2: туйястіыд
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: туйясӧдзыд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxSg2: туйясланяд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxSg2: туйясланьсьыд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxSg2: туйясланяд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxSg2: туйясланьсяньыд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxSg2: туйясланьӧдыд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxSg2: туйясланьтіыд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxSg2: туйясланьӧдзыд
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: туйясыс
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: туйясыслӧн
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl: туйясыслысь
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: туйясыслы
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: туйяссӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg3: туйяснас
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: туйясыскӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxSg3: туйястӧгыс
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cns: туйясысла
     туй+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg3: туйяссяыс
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: туйясас
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: туйяссьыс
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: туйясас
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: туйясланьыс
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: туйяссяньыс
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: туйясӧдыс
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg3: туйястіыс
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: туйясӧдзыс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxSg3: туйясланяс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxSg3: туйясланьсьыс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxSg3: туйясланяс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxSg3: туйясланьсяньыс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxSg3: туйясланьӧдыс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxSg3: туйясланьтіыс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxSg3: туйясланьӧдзыc
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: туйясным
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Gen: туйяснымлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl: туйяснымлысь
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Dat: туйяснымлы
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Acc: туйяснымӧс
     туй+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl1: туйяснаным
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Com: туйяснымкӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxPl1: туйястӧгным
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Cns: туйяснымла
     туй+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl1: туйяссяным
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: туйясаным
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: туйяссьыным
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: туйясаным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: туйясланьным
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: туйяссяньным
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: туйясӧдным
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl1: туйястіным
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: туйясӧдзным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl1: туйясланяным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl1: туйясланьсьыным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl1: туйясланяным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl1: туйясланьсяньным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl1: туйясланьӧдным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl1: туйясланьтіным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl1: туйясланьӧдзным
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: туйясныд
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Gen: туйясныдлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl: туйясныдлысь
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Dat: туйясныдлы
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Acc: туйяснытӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl2: туйяснаныд
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Com: туйясныдкӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: туйястӧгныд
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cns: туйясныдла
     туй+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl2: туйяссяныд
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: туйясаныд
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: туйяссьыныд
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: туйясаныд
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Apr: туйясныдлань
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: туйяссяньныд
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: туйясӧдныд
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl2: туйястіныд
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: туйясӧдзныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl2: туйясланяныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl2: туйясланьсьыныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl2: туйясланяныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl2: туйясланьсяньныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl2: туйясланьӧдныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl2: туйясланьтіныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl2: туйясланьӧдзныд
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: туйясныс
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen: туйясныслӧн
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl: туйясныслысь
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat: туйясныслы
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc: туйяснысӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl3: туйяснаныс
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com: туйясныскӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: туйястӧгныс
